Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2

Business and Industrial Development Corporations

45-8-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee BIDCO Act.”

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross-References. Business enterprise office, title 4, ch. 26.

Community-based development organizations, title 13, ch. 14, part 2.

Contracts for state services, §12-4-109.

Development credit corporations, title 48, ch. 101, part 1.

Economic and community development, title 4, ch. 3, part 7.

Local development authority, title 4, ch. 31.

Minority owned, women owned and small business procurement and contracting, title 12, ch. 3, part 8.

Small business development center, §49-8-603.

45-8-202. Purpose — Construction.

It is determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding by the general assembly that:

The availability of financial and management assistance is an important resource to small and medium size businesses to locate, remain and expand in the state, which, in time, will result in increased employment opportunities in the state;

There is a need for financial and management resource alternatives to small and medium size businesses in the state due to a lack of bank financing in situations, including, but not limited to, start-ups, under-collateralization, management problems, and above-average risk projects;

Many small and medium size businesses, although in a growth mode, do not meet the investment criteria of venture capital firms; and

In order to increase employment opportunities and commercial transactions in the state, there is a need to encourage the development of resources directed at small and medium size businesses, which will help the businesses locate, remain and expand in the state.

It is further determined and declared that the purposes of this part shall be to:

Promote economic development by encouraging the formation of private financial institutions known as BIDCOs to help meet the financing assistance and management assistance needs of growth-oriented small and medium size businesses in the state; and

Provide for the licensing and regulation of BIDCOs to prevent fraud, conflict of interest, and mismanagement, in order to encourage:

Private equity investments in BIDCOs; and

Pension funds, insurance companies, foundations, utilities and other institutions to lend funds to BIDCOs.

This part shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purpose.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 2.

45-8-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affiliate” means, if used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person, a person controlling or controlled by the specified person, or a person controlled by a person who also controls the specified person;

“Applicant” means a Tennessee corporation that has submitted an application for a license under this part;

“Associate” means, if used with respect to a licensee:

A controlling person, director, officer, agent, or advisor of that licensee. As used in this subdivision (3)(A), “controlling person” means a person or any combination of persons acting in concert, owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, a twenty percent (20%) or greater equity interest; or

A relative of any person referred to in subdivision (3)(A);

“BIDCO” means a business and industrial development corporation licensed under this part;

“Business firm” means a person that transacts business on a regular basis, or that proposes to transact business on a regular and continual basis;

“Capital” means equity investments evidenced by stock, paid-in capital (amounting to, but not less than, fifty percent (50%) of its stock) and undivided profits;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of financial institutions;

“Control” means, if used with respect to a specified person, the power to direct or cause the direction of, directly or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries, the management and policies of the specified person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services. A natural person shall not be considered to control another person solely on account of being a director, officer, or employee of the other person;

“Controlling person” means, if used with respect to a specified person, a person who controls the specified person, directly or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries;

“Corporate name” means the name of a corporation as set forth in the charter of the corporation;

“Insolvent” means a licensee that ceases to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business, that cannot pay its debts as they become due, or whose liabilities exceed its assets;

“Interest” is compensation for the use or detention of or forbearance to collect money over a period of time, and does not include compensation for other purposes including, but not limited to, time price differentials, loan charges, brokerage commissions, management fees or commitment fees;

“Interests of a licensee” includes the interests of shareholders of the licensee;

“License” means a license issued under this part authorizing a Tennessee corporation to transact business as a BIDCO;

“Licensee” means a Tennessee corporation that is licensed under this part;

“Officer” means:

If used with respect to a corporation, a person appointed or designated as an officer of the corporation by or pursuant to applicable law or the charter or bylaws of the corporation, or a person who performs, with respect to the corporation, functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation; and

If used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person or a corporation, a person who performs, with respect to the specified person, functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation with respect to the corporation;

“Order” includes an approval, authorization, consent, exemption, denial, prohibition, or other official act taken by the commissioner;

“Person” includes an individual, proprietorship, joint venture, partnership, trust, business trust, syndicate, association, joint stock company, corporation, cooperative, government, agency of a government, or any other entity or organization. If used with respect to acquiring control of or controlling a specified person, “person” includes a combination of two (2) or more persons acting in concert;

“Principal shareholder” means a person that owns, directly or indirectly, of record or beneficially, securities representing ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of a corporation;

“Relative” means parent, legal guardian, child, sibling, spouse, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, brother-in-law, daughter-in-law, sister-in-law, grandparent, grandchild, nephew, niece, uncle or aunt;

“State” means the state of Tennessee;

“Subject person” means a controlling person, subsidiary, or affiliate of a licensee, a director, officer, or employee of a licensee or of a controlling person, subsidiary, or affiliate of a licensee, or any other person who participates in the conduct of the business of a licensee;

“Subsidiary” means, if used with respect to a licensee, a company or business firm that the licensee holds control of as permitted by § 45-8-212(a)(2), (3), (4) or (5);

“Tennessee corporation” means a corporation, whether for profit or nonprofit, incorporated under Tennessee law;

“Uniform Administrative Procedures Act” refers to title 4, chapter 5; and

“Well capitalized” means, in the case of a licensee under this part, a licensee that has stockholders' equity at least equal to the greater of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or fifteen percent (15%) of total assets, that is not subject to any administrative enforcement action or order and the condition of which was considered as satisfactory in its last examination in the opinion of the commissioner.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 3; 1997, ch. 131, § 1.

45-8-204. Relation to other acts.

A corporation licensed under and pursuant to this part shall be known as a BIDCO, shall be subject to regulation by the commissioner, and shall be deemed subject to the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27, or the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 51-68, to the extent that the law is not inconsistent with the express provisions of this part.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 4.

45-8-205. Corporate names.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a person transacting business in this state, other than a licensee, shall not use a name or title that indicates that the person is a business and industrial development corporation, including, but not limited to, use of the term “BIDCO,” and shall not otherwise represent that the person is a business and industrial development corporation or a licensee.

Before being issued a license under this part, a Tennessee corporation that proposes to apply for a license or that applies for a license may perform, under a name that indicates that the corporation is a business and industrial development corporation, the acts necessary to apply for and obtain a license and to otherwise prepare to commence transacting business as a licensee. The corporation shall not represent that it is a licensee until after the license has been obtained.

A BIDCO licensed under this part shall not use a name or title that would indicate that it is a bank or trust company.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 5; 1997, ch. 131, § 2.

45-8-206. Authority and powers of commissioner.

The commissioner shall administer this part and shall have supervision responsibility for all BIDCOs incorporated under the laws of this state.

The commissioner may issue orders and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Whenever the commissioner issues an order or license under this part, the commissioner may impose conditions that are deemed necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this part.

Every final order, decision or license action of the commissioner under subsections (b) and (c) is subject to administrative review under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

In the event a person does not comply with an order issued pursuant to subsections (b) and (c), the commissioner may petition a chancery court having jurisdiction to seek injunctive relief to compel compliance with the order. The power is conferred and the duty is imposed upon the several chancery courts, in all proper cases, to award injunctive relief; provided, that the order issued by the commissioner shall not be reviewable in a proceeding initiated under this subsection (e).

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 6.

45-8-207. Schedule of fees.

The commissioner shall establish by regulation a schedule of fees that the commissioner determines to be reasonable and necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, in connection with the licensing, administration, examination and supervision of BIDCOs. The schedule shall be subject to amendment by the commissioner by regulation from time to time.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 7.

45-8-208. Licenses — Application — Approval — Issuance — Expiration.

A Tennessee corporation may apply to the commissioner for a license to form and conduct business as a BIDCO. A person other than a Tennessee corporation may not apply for the license.

An application filed with the commissioner under this part shall be in the form and contain the information that the commissioner may require, but shall contain, at a minimum, the following:

A detailed business plan setting forth the services to be provided by the proposed BIDCO to business firms located within or outside of the state;

A summary of the geographical business markets of the proposed BIDCO;

Information concerning the experience of the management of the proposed BIDCO and how the experience relates to the execution of the business plan referred to in subdivision (b)(1);

Location of the proposed main office of the BIDCO and any branch offices, or the vicinity thereof;

A detailed summary of how the management of the proposed BIDCO intends to implement a reasonable and prudent policy for conserving and investing the capital of the BIDCO;

A summary of the types of business firms to be assisted by the proposed BIDCO; and

Three (3) years of detailed financial projections.

After a review of an application and receipt and review of any additional or supplemental information requested by the commissioner, the commissioner shall approve the application for a license under this part if the commissioner determines that:

The applicant has, or has firm financing commitments from equity investors or debt sources for, cash or similar liquid assets sufficient to demonstrate that prior to the time the applicant is authorized to transact business as a BIDCO, the applicant will have liquid assets available to provide financing assistance to business firms in an amount adequate for the applicant to transact business as a BIDCO;

Each director, officer, and controlling person of the applicant is of good character and sound financial standing;

Each director and officer of the applicant is competent to perform the director's functions with respect to the applicant; and

The directors and officers of the applicant are collectively able to manage the business of the applicant as a BIDCO;

It is reasonable to believe that the applicant, if licensed, will comply with this part; and

The applicant has reasonable prospects of being a viable, ongoing BIDCO and of satisfying the basic objectives of its business plan.

The commissioner shall require a BIDCO to have a capital structure that the commissioner deems necessary for the transaction of business, but not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

If an application for a license under this part is approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of the license are fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant.

A licensee shall post the license, or a copy thereof, in a conspicuous place in each of the main and branch offices of the licensee.

A license shall not be transferable or assignable.

Each license shall expire on December 31 of each year, and be subject to an annual renewal.

If the commissioner denies an application, the commissioner shall provide the applicant with a written statement explaining the basis for the denial.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 8.

45-8-209. Surrender of license.

Upon approval of a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its board of directors and after complying with subsection (b), a licensee may apply to the commissioner to have the commissioner accept the surrender of the license of the licensee. If the commissioner determines that the requirements of this section have been satisfied, the commissioner shall approve the application, unless in the opinion of the commissioner the purpose of the application is to evade a current or prospective action by the commissioner under this part.

Not less than sixty (60) days before filing an application with the commissioner under subsection (a), a licensee shall notify each of its shareholders of its intention to file an application. Each shareholder shall be notified of the right to file with the licensee an objection to the proposed surrender of the license within the sixty-day period and shall be advised that, if the shareholder files an objection, the shareholder should send a copy of the objection to the commissioner. If shareholders holding twenty percent (20%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of the licensee file objections, the licensee shall not proceed with the application under subsection (a) unless the application is approved by a vote of shareholders holding two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding voting securities of the licensee.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 9.

45-8-210. Licensee — Business and powers.

The business of a licensee shall be the business of providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms. A licensee shall not engage in a business other than the business of providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms.

The powers of a licensee include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

To borrow money and otherwise incur indebtedness for purposes authorized herein, including issuance of corporate bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

A licensee may determine the form and the terms and conditions for financing assistance provided by that licensee to a business firm including, but not limited to:

Forms such as loans;

Purchase of debt instruments;

Straight equity investments such as purchase of common stock or preferred stock;

Debt with equity features such as warrants to purchase stock, convertible debentures, or receipt of a percent of net income or sales;

Royalty based financing;

guaranteeing of debt; or

Leasing of property;

A licensee may purchase securities of a business firm either directly or indirectly through an underwriter; and

A licensee may participate in any government program for which the licensee is eligible and that has as one (1) of its functions the provision or facilitation of financing assistance or management assistance to business firms;

Management assistance provided by a licensee to a business firm may encompass both management or technical advice and management or technical services;

Financing assistance or management assistance provided by a licensee to a business firm shall be for the business purposes of that business firm;

A licensee may exercise the incidental powers that are necessary or convenient to carry on the business of, or are reasonably related to the business of, providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms;

In connection with an extension of credit by a licensee, a licensee may charge or receive interest at any rate that does not exceed the maximum rate that may be charged or received by any other lender in Tennessee, that is chartered or licensed by the state of Tennessee or any agency or instrumentality of the state of Tennessee, or charged or received by a small business investment company licensed by the small business administration, subject only to those terms and conditions stipulated in this part;

As used in subdivision (b)(6)(A), “interest” does not include anything of value that is contingent on performance or value of the borrower, including, but not limited to, a percentage of net income of the borrower, royalties, stock in the borrower, warrants to purchase stock in the borrower and convertibility of debentures; and

In connection with funding its operations, a licensee may sell small business loans, other securities and related collateral to special purpose corporations, including subsidiaries of the licensee, grantor or other trusts or similar entities that purchase the loans and resell or pledge the loans to third parties in connection with securitizations and similar transactions, and the entities may collect principal, interest, and fees with respect to loans originated by a licensee without being required to be licensed under this part.

A licensee shall transact its business in a prudent business manner and shall maintain itself in a viable condition.

In determining whether a licensee is transacting business in a prudent business manner, the commissioner shall not consider the risk of the financing assistance provided by the licensee to a business firm, unless the commissioner determines that the risk is so great compared with the realistically expected return as to demonstrate mismanagement of the licensee.

Subsection (a) shall not limit the authority of the commissioner to do any of the following:

Determine that a licensee's financing assistance to a single business firm or a group of affiliated business firms is in violation of this subsection (c) if the amount of financing assistance is unduly large in relation to the total assets or the total shareholders' equity of the licensee;

Require that a licensee maintain a reserve in the amount of anticipated losses unless the loans have been marked to market value pursuant to applicable accounting standards; or

Require that a licensee have in effect a written financing assistance policy, approved by its board of directors, including credit evaluation criteria and other matters. The commissioner shall not require that a licensee adopt a financing assistance policy that contains standards that prevent the licensee from exercising needed flexibility in evaluating and structuring financing assistance to business firms on a deal-by-deal basis.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 10; 1997, ch. 131, §§ 3-5.

45-8-211. Offices — Personnel.

A licensee shall maintain not less than one (1) office in the state.

Each office of a licensee, whether within or outside of the state, shall be located in a place that is reasonably accessible to the public.

A licensee shall maintain at each of its offices personnel who are competent to conduct the business of the office.

Upon written notice to and consent from the commissioner, a licensee may establish, relocate or close an office, except that no consent shall be required if the licensee is well capitalized.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 11; 1997, ch. 131, § 6.

45-8-212. Control of business firms.

One (1) or more other licensees, or one (1) or more directors, officers, principal shareholders, or affiliates of another licensee or licensees, either by itself or in concert with one (1) or more of its directors, officers, principal shareholders, or affiliates, shall not hold control of a business firm, except as follows:

If and to the extent necessary to protect the interests of a licensee as a creditor of, or investor in, a business firm, a licensee that has provided financing assistance to a business firm may acquire and hold control of the business firm. Unless the commissioner approves a longer period, a licensee holding control of a business firm under this subdivision (a)(1) shall divest itself of the interest that constitutes holding control as soon as practicable or within three (3) years after acquiring the interest, whichever is earlier;

With the approval of the commissioner, a licensee may acquire and hold control of a corporation that is licensed as a small business investment company under the United States Small Business Investment Act of 1958, (15 U.S.C. § 661 et seq.), as amended;

With the approval of the commissioner, a licensee may acquire and hold control of a company that is a development company, whether or not the development company has been or may become certified by the United States small business administration pursuant to the United States Small Business Investment Act of 1958;

With the approval of the commissioner, a licensee may acquire and hold control of another business firm that is engaged in no business other than the business of providing financing assistance or management assistance to business firms; and

With the approval of the commissioner, a licensee may acquire and hold control of a business firm not referred to in subdivisions (a)(1)-(4). The commissioner shall not approve an application under this subdivision (a)(5) unless the commissioner determines that the acquisition will promote the purposes of this part.

If a licensee anticipates acquiring and holding control of a business firm under subdivision (a)(1), the licensee shall file with the commissioner a plan for acquiring and holding control of the business firm, which shall include, at a minimum, the following:

The reasons it is necessary for the licensee to acquire and hold control of the business firm;

The percentage of outstanding voting securities of the business firm that the licensee anticipates acquiring and holding;

The licensee's proposed course of action upon obtaining control of the business firm; and

The length of time the licensee anticipates it will be necessary to hold control of the business firm.

The commissioner may require a licensee to demonstrate the necessity for the licensee to hold control of a business firm under subdivision (a)(1).

For the purposes of this section, “hold control” means ownership, directly or indirectly, of record or beneficially, of voting securities greater than:

For a business firm with outstanding voting securities held by fewer than fifty (50) shareholders, forty percent (40%) of the outstanding voting securities; and

For a business firm with outstanding voting securities held by fifty (50) or more shareholders, twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding voting securities.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. The United States Small Business Investment Act of 1958, referred to in this section, is primarily codified in 15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq., and also in 12 U.S.C. § 371.

45-8-213. Conflicts of interest.

If a licensee provides financing assistance to a business firm or engages in another business transaction, and if that financing assistance or transaction involves a potential conflict of interest, the terms and conditions under which the licensee provides the financing assistance or engages in the transaction shall not be less favorable to the licensee than the terms and conditions that would be required by the licensee in the ordinary course of business if the transaction did not involve a potential conflict of interest. Each person who participates in the decision of the licensee relating to a transaction described in this section and has knowledge of a potential conflict of interest involving that transaction shall take care that the potential conflict of interest is disclosed in the documents of the transaction or, for a business transaction not involving financing assistance, in appropriate documents.

For the purposes of subsection (a), transactions engaged in by a licensee that involve a potential conflict of interest include, but are not limited to, the following:

Providing financing assistance to a principal shareholder of the licensee, to a person controlled by a principal shareholder of the licensee, or to a director, officer, partner, relative, controlling person, or affiliate of a principal shareholder of the licensee;

Providing financing assistance to a business firm that is a principal shareholder of the licensee, or to a director, officer, partner, relative, controlling person, or affiliate of a principal shareholder of the licensee, or to a person controlled by a principal shareholder of the licensee that provides or plans to provide contemporaneous financing assistance;

Providing financing assistance to a business firm that has or is expected to have a substantial business relationship with another business firm that has a director, officer, or controlling person who is also a director, officer or controlling person of the licensee or who is the spouse of a director, officer, or controlling person of the licensee;

Providing financing assistance to a business firm if that business firm, or a director, officer or controlling person of that business firm, contemporaneously, has loaned or will loan money to an associate of the licensee;

Providing financing assistance for the purchase of property of an associate or principal shareholder of the licensee; and

Selling or otherwise transferring any of its assets to an associate or principal shareholder of the licensee.

Nothing in this section or in any other section of this part limits the authority of the commissioner to determine that an act involves a conflict of interest and, therefore, is an unsafe or unsound act.

Except with the approval of the commissioner, a licensee shall not provide a lien on or security interest in any of its property for the purpose of securing an obligation of, or an obligation incurred for the benefit of, another person, other than a direct or indirect subsidiary thereof.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 13; 1997, ch. 131, § 7.

45-8-214. Merger, acquisition or sale of business assets.

Without the prior approval of the commissioner, a licensee shall not consummate a transaction involving a merger, acquisition of control, or a sale of all or substantially all of its business assets, where the licensee is a principal party to the transaction.

The commissioner shall not approve the merger of a licensee with another corporation unless:

The licensee is the surviving corporation; or

If the licensee is the disappearing corporation, the surviving corporation is also a licensee.

The commissioner shall approve an application by a licensee for approval of a proposed transaction involving a merger, acquisition of control or a sale of all or substantially all of the licensee's business assets, only upon a finding by the commissioner that:

The merger, acquisition, or sale will be on a sound financial basis with respect to the acquiring licensee;

Upon consummation of the merger, acquisition, or sale, it is reasonable to believe that the acquiring licensee will comply with this part; and

The merger, acquisition, or sale will not have a major detrimental impact upon competition in the providing of financing assistance or management assistance to business firms, or if there will be a major detrimental impact, the merger, acquisition, or sale is necessary in the interests of the financial soundness of any of the parties to the merger, acquisition, or sale, or is otherwise, on balance, in the public interest.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 14.

45-8-215. Records and reports.

A licensee shall make and keep books, accounts, and other records in a form and manner that the commissioner may require. The records shall be kept at the place and shall be preserved for the length of time that the commissioner may specify.

Not more than ninety (90) days after the close of each fiscal year of a licensee, or a longer period if specified by the commissioner, a licensee shall file with the commissioner an audited report containing the following:

Financial statements, including balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in capital accounts, and statement of changes in financial position;

A report, certificate, or opinion of an independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant who performs the audit, stating that the financial statements were prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and

Other information that the commissioner may require.

In addition to the audited report required by subsection (b), a licensee shall file with the commissioner other reports and at times that the commissioner may require. Any report required by the commissioner under this section shall be in a form and shall contain information that the commissioner may specify.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 15.

Cross-References. Annual report of accomplishments, §45-8-225.

Report of criminal violations, §45-8-224.

45-8-216. Examination by commissioner.

The commissioner shall visit and examine each licensee as frequently as the commissioner deems it necessary or expedient. On the occasion of every visit and examination, the commissioner shall, in company with one (1) or more of the officers of the licensee, if requested by the licensee, be given free access to every part of the office or place of business and to the assets, securities, books, papers and records of the licensee.

If, in the commissioner's opinion, it is necessary for a thorough examination of a licensee, the commissioner may retain one (1) or more accountants, attorneys, appraisers, or other third parties to assist the commissioner in the examination. Within ten (10) days after receipt of a statement from the commissioner, the licensee shall pay or reimburse the fees, costs and expenses of any third parties retained by the commissioner under this subsection (b).

The commissioner shall also have the power to examine or cause to be examined subsidiary corporations of BIDCOs subject to the commissioner's supervision under this part.

Any examination under this section may be made by any person or persons designated by the commissioner, and in that case, all the powers vested in the commissioner by this section shall be possessed by the person or persons so designated. The commissioner shall furnish to each examiner a commission under the signature of the commissioner and official seal of the department, which the examiner shall exhibit to the officer or officers of the BIDCO proposed to be examined as the examiner's authority for making the examination.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 16.

45-8-217. Investigations.

The commissioner may make the investigations within or without the state as the commissioner may consider necessary or appropriate for determining whether to approve an application filed with the commissioner under this part, or for determining whether a licensee or other person has violated or is about to violate this part, to aid in the enforcement of this part, or to aid in issuing an order or promulgating a rule or regulation pursuant to this part.

Any investigation under this section may be made by any person or persons designated by the commissioner, and in that case, all the powers vested in the commissioner by this section shall be possessed by the person or persons so designated. When the investigation is made without the presence of the commissioner, the commissioner shall furnish to the person or persons conducting the investigation a commission under the signature of the commissioner and official seal of the department, which shall be exhibited to any person contacted in the course of the investigation.

For purposes of an investigation under this section, the commissioner may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, including, but not limited to, the officers, directors, trustees, partners, managers and employees of any entity being examined, compel the attendance of witnesses, take evidence, and require the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records that the commissioner considers relevant to the investigation.

If any person fails to comply with a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum issued by the commissioner under this section or fails to testify with respect to a matter concerning which the person may be lawfully questioned, the chancery court, upon application of the commissioner, may issue an order requiring the attendance of the person and the giving of testimony or production of evidence.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 17.

45-8-218. Issuance of orders — Notice — Hearings.

The commissioner may issue an order, setting forth an appropriate remedy, including, but not limited to, a cease-and-desist order, an order removing any person from office with a licensee, or prohibiting any person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the licensee, upon a finding by the commissioner that the licensee, subject person or other person:

Has violated, is violating, or is about to violate any provision of this part or other applicable law, rule or regulation;

Has engaged or participated, or is engaging or participating, or is about to engage or participate, detrimentally with respect to the business of the licensee;

Has been indicted or convicted for a crime involving dishonesty or breach of trust; or

Is conducting acts that threaten the interests of the licensee or may threaten to impair public confidence in the licensee.

Notice and hearing shall be provided in advance of any action authorized in subsection (a). In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take the action, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon application to rescind the action taken.

The licensee, subject person or other person to whom an order is issued under subsection (a), is entitled to an administrative review of the order pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 18.

45-8-219. Civil penalties.

Should the commissioner find that any person has violated this part or has violated an order issued pursuant to § 45-8-218, the commissioner may order the person to pay to the state a civil penalty in an amount that the commissioner may specify. However, the amount of the civil penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation, or in the case of a continuing violation, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day for which the violation continues. In determining the amount of the penalty, the commissioner shall consider the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the size of the financial resources and good faith of the person charged, the gravity of the violation and other matters as justice may require.

A person assessed a penalty under subsection (a) shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing upon request within ten (10) days of the issuance of the notice of assessment. The commissioner's decision after a hearing or otherwise shall constitute a final order and may be reviewed as provided in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5; provided, that the original order shall not be reviewable in a proceeding initiated under this subsection (b).

Subsection (a) is in addition to, and not an alternative to, other provisions of this part that authorize the commissioner to issue orders or to take other action on account of a violation of this part.

Subsection (a) is in addition to, and not an alternative to, any criminal penalties that may be available under § 45-8-223 or any other criminal laws.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 19.

Cross-References. Intentional violations, penalties, §45-8-223.

45-8-220. Show cause order — Appointment of receiver.

If the commissioner finds that a licensee is insolvent, or the licensee is transacting business without authority or in violation of this part or any other law, or it is contrary to the purposes of this part for the licensee to continue business, the commissioner shall communicate the facts to the attorney general and reporter who shall file in the chancery court, in any county where the licensee is doing business, a complaint setting forth the facts and applying for an order requiring the licensee to show cause why its business should not be closed.

In a proper case made, the chancery court shall have the power to appoint a receiver to take charge of, settle and wind up the affairs of a licensee under the direction of the court, to enjoin the licensee from doing business, or to make other orders or decrees as the circumstances warrant and the court deems proper.

Acts 1989, ch. 124, § 20.